North Dakota, session 69, SB2295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-27-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-27-02. Per student payments - Required reports.
1. The superintendent of public instruction may not forward state aid payments to a
school district beyond the September payment unless the district has filed the
September tenth fall enrollment report with the superintendent.
2. The superintendent of public instruction may not forward state aid payments to a
school district beyond the October payment unless the district has filed the following
with the superintendent:
a. The June thirtieth student membership and attendance report;
b. An annual school district financial report; and
c. The personnel report forms for licensed and nonlicensed employees.
3. On or before December fifteenth, each school district shall file with the superintendent
of public instruction the taxable valuation and mill levy certifications. If a district fails to
Page No. 1 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
file the taxable valuation and mill levy certifications by the required date, the
superintendent of public instruction may not forward to the district any state aid
payments to which the district is entitled, until the taxable valuation and mill levy
certifications are filed.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 15.1-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
State aid payments for public schools, nonpublic schools, and students receiving
home education.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Cost per student" means the statewide average educational cost per
kindergarten through grade twelve student for the previous school year.
b. "Registered student" means a kindergarten through grade twelve student who
has registered with the student's school district of residence to receive state aid.
c. "Student" means a student or the parent or legal guardian of the student as
applicable.
2. A student who receives home education in the state or who is enrolled in a nonpublic
school in the state shall register with the student's school district of residence in the
manner prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction if the student wishes to
receive state aid for the education of the student.
3. The superintendent of public instruction shall determine the amount of state aid
payable to each school district by multiplying the cost per student by the sum of:
a. The weighted average daily membership for the school district; and
b. The number of registered students who receive home education under chapter
15.1 - 23, or are enrolled at an approved nonpublic school under section
15.1 - 06 - 06.1 .
4. To provide state aid to a registered student, a school district shall forward:
a. To a nonpublic school in the state, seventy-five percent of the cost per student.
b. To the parent or guardian of a student receiving home education in the state, fifty
percent of the cost per student.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-15-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 2 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
57-15-01.1. Protection of taxpayers and taxing districts.
Each taxing district may levy the lesser of the amount in dollars as certified in the budget of
the governing body, or the amount in dollars as allowed in this section, subject to the following:
1. No taxing district may levy more taxes expressed in dollars than the amounts allowed
by this section.
2. For purposes of this section:
a. "Base year" means the taxing district's taxable year with the highest amount
levied in dollars in property taxes of the three taxable years immediately
preceding the budget year;.
b. "Budget year" means the taxing district's year for which the levy is being
determined under this section;.
c. "Calculated mill rate" means the mill rate that results from dividing the base year
taxes levied by the sum of the taxable value of the taxable property in the base
year plus the taxable value of the property exempt by local discretion or
charitable status, calculated in the same manner as the taxable property; and.
d. "Property exempt by local discretion or charitable status" means property
exempted from taxation as new or expanding businesses under chapter 40-57.1;
improvements to property under chapter 57-02.2; or buildings belonging to
institutions of public charity, new single-family residential or townhouse or
condominium property, property used for early childhood services, or pollution
abatement improvements under section 57-02-08.
e. "Taxing district" means any political subdivision, other than a school district,
empowered by law to levy taxes.
3. A taxing district may elect to levy the amount levied in dollars in the base year. Any
levy under this section must be specifically approved by a resolution approved by the
governing body of the taxing district. Before determining the levy limitation under this
section, the dollar amount levied in the base year must be:
a. Reduced by an amount equal to the sum determined by application of the base
year's calculated mill rate for that taxing district to the final base year taxable
valuation of any taxable property and property exempt by local discretion or
Page No. 3 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
charitable status which is not included in the taxing district for the budget year but
was included in the taxing district for the base year.
b. Increased by an amount equal to the sum determined by the application of the
base year's calculated mill rate for that taxing district to the final budget year
taxable valuation of any taxable property or property exempt by local discretion or
charitable status which was not included in the taxing district for the base year
but which is included in the taxing district for the budget year.
c. Reduced to reflect expired temporary mill levy increases authorized by the
electors of the taxing district. For purposes of this subdivision, an expired
temporary mill levy increase does not include a school district general fund mill
rate exceeding one hundred ten mills which has expired or has not received
approval of electors for an extension under subsection 2 of section 57-64-03.
d. Reduced by the amount of state aid under chapter 15.1-27, which is determined
by multiplying the budget year taxable valuation of the school district by the
lesser of the base year mill rate of the school district minus sixty mills or fifty
mills, if the base year is a taxable year before 2013.
4. In addition to any other levy limitation factor under this section, a taxing district may
increase its levy in dollars to reflect new or increased mill levies authorized by the
legislative assembly or authorized by the electors of the taxing district.
5. Under this section a taxing district may supersede any applicable mill levy limitations
otherwise provided by law, or a taxing district may levy up to the mill levy limitations
otherwise provided by law without reference to this section, but the provisions of this
section do not apply to the following:
a. Any irrepealable tax to pay bonded indebtedness levied pursuant to section 16 of
article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.
b. The one-mill levy for the state medical center authorized by section 10 of article X
of the Constitution of North Dakota.
6. A school district choosing to determine its levy authority under this section may apply
subsection 3 only to the amount in dollars levied for general fund purposes under
section 57-15-14 or, if the levy in the base year included separate general fund and
special fund levies under sections 57-15-14 and 57-15-14.2, the school district may
Page No. 4 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
apply subsection 3 to the total amount levied in dollars in the base year for both the
general fund and special fund accounts. School district levies under any section other
than section 57-15-14 may be made within applicable limitations but those levies are
not subject to subsection 3.
7. Optional levies under this section may be used by any city or county that has adopted
a home rule charter unless the provisions of the charter supersede state laws related
to property tax levy limitations.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-15-14 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Unless authorized by the electors of the school district in accordance with this section,
a school district may not impose greater levies than those permitted under section
57-15-14.2.
a. In any school district having a total population in excess of four thousand
according to the last federal decennial census there may be levied any specific
number of mills that upon resolution of the school board has been submitted to
and approved by a majority of the qualified electors voting upon the question at
any regular or special school district election.
b. In any school district having a total population of fewer than four thousand, there
may be levied any specific number of mills that upon resolution of the school
board has been approved by fifty-five percent of the qualified electors voting
upon the question at any regular or special school election.
c. After June 30, 2009, in any school district election for approval by electors of
increased levy authority under subsection 1 or 2, the ballot must specify the
number of mills proposed for approval, and the number of taxable years for which
that approval is to apply. After June 30, 2009, approval by electors of increased
levy authority under subsection 1 or 2 may not be effective for more than ten
taxable years.
d. The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills under this section
approved by electors of a school district before July 1, 2009, is terminated
effective for taxable years after 2015. If the electors of a school district subject to
this subsection have not approved a levy for taxable years after 2015 of up to a
Page No. 5 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
specific number of mills under this section by December 31, 2015, the school
district levy limitation for subsequent years is subject to the limitations under
section 57-15-01.1 or this section.
e. For taxable years beginning after 2012:
(1) The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills, approved by
electors of a school district for any period of time that includes a taxable
year before 2009, must be reduced by one hundred fifteen mills as a
precondition of receiving state aid in accordance with chapter 15.1-27.
(2) The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills, approved by
electors of a school district for any period of time that does not include a
taxable year before 2009, must be reduced by forty mills as a precondition
of receiving state aid in accordance with chapter 15.1-27.
(3) The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills, placed on the
ballot in a school district election for electoral approval of increased levy
authority under subdivision a or b, after June 30, 20132024, must be stated
as a specific number of mills of general fund levy authority and must include
a statement thatincluding the specific statutory school district general fund
levy limitation is seventy mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of the
school district authority under section 57 - 15 - 14.2 that is proposed to be
increased under this section.
f. The authority for an unlimited levy approved by electors of a school district before
July 1, 2009, is terminated effective for taxable years after 2015. If the electors of
a school district subject to this subsection have not approved a levy of up to a
specific number of mills under this section by December 31, 2015, the school
district levy limitation for subsequent years is subject to the limitations under
section 57-15-01.1 or this section.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 57-15-14.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-15-14.2. School district levies.
1. The board of a school district may levy a tax not exceeding the amount in dollars that
the school district levied for the prior year, plus twelve percent, up to a levy of seventy
Page No. 6 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
mills on the taxable valuation of the district, for any purpose related to the provision of
educational services. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into the school
district's general fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may
not be transferred into any other fund.
2. The board of a school district may levy no more than twelve mills on the taxable
valuation of the district, for miscellaneous purposes and expenses. The proceeds of
this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the miscellaneous fund and
used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into
any other fund.
3. The board of a school district may levy no more than three mills on the taxable
valuation of the district for deposit into a special reserve fund, in accordance with
chapter 57-19.
4. The board of a school district may levy no more than the number of mills necessary,
on the taxable valuation of the district, for the payment of tuition, in accordance with
section 15.1-29-15. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund
known as the tuition fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds
may not be transferred into any other fund.
5.2. The board of a school district may levy no more than five mills on the taxable valuation
of the district, pursuant to section 57-15-15.1, for purposes of developing a school
safety plan in accordance with section 15.1-09-60. The proceeds of this levy must be
deposited into a special fund known as the school safety plan fund and used in
accordance with this subsection.
6.3. Nothing in this section limits the board of a school district from levying:
a. Mills for a building fund, as permitted in sections 15.1-09-49 and 57-15-16; and
b. Mills necessary to pay principal and interest on the bonded debt of the district,
including the mills necessary to pay principal and interest on any bonded debt
incurred under section 57-15-17.1 before July 1, 2013.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 1 of section 57-20-07.1 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. Provide information identifying the property tax savings provided by the state of
North Dakota. The tax statement must include a line item that is entitled
Page No. 7 25.0736.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
"legislative tax relief" and identifies the dollar amount of property tax savings
realized by the taxpayer under chapter 50-34 for taxable years before 2019,
chapter 50-35 for taxable years after 2018, and chapter 15.1-27.
(1) For purposes of this subdivision, legislative tax relief under chapter 15.1-27
is determined by multiplying the taxable value for the taxable year for each
parcel shown on the tax statement by the number of mills of mill levy
reduction grant under chapter 57-64 for the 2012 taxable year plus the
number of mills determined by subtracting from the 2012 taxable year mill
rate of the school district in which the parcel is located the lesser of one
hundred eighty - five mills or the sum o f:
(a) Fifty millsThe number of mills of mill levy reduction grant under
chapter 57 - 64 for the 2012 taxable year ; orand
(b) The 2012 taxable year mill rate of the school district minus sixty mills.
(2) Legislative tax relief under chapter 50-35 is determined by multiplying the
taxable value for the taxable year for each parcel shown on the tax
statement by the number of mills of relief determined by dividing the amount
calculated in subsection 1 of section 50-35-03 for a human service zone by
the taxable value of taxable property in the zone for the taxable year.
SECTION 7. REPEAL. Sections 15.1-27-04.1, 15.1-27-04.2, 15.1-27-04.3, 15.1-27-15.1,
and 15.1-27-20.2 of the North Dakota Century Code are repealed.
SECTION 8. REPEAL. Section 15.1-29-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 3, 4, 5, and 8 of this Act are effective for taxable
years beginning after December 31, 2024.
Page No. 8 25.0736.01000